Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Chapter 9. Soybean Promotion Board

§ 69-9-1.
Purpose of chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is to promote the growth and development of the soybean industry in Mississippi by research, advertisement promotions and education and market development, thereby promoting the general welfare of the people of this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4575-231; Laws, 1970, ch. 265, § 1; brought forward without change, Laws, 2009, ch. 393, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 69-9-3.
Creation, membership and organization of board.

The Mississippi Soybean Promotion Board is hereby created, to be composed of twelve (12) members to be appointed by the Governor to serve terms of three (3) years, as hereinafter provided. All of the twelve (12) members of the board shall be producers of soybeans in the State of Mississippi. Within ten (10) days following the effective date of this chapter, each of the following organizations, namely, Mississippi Farm Bureau Federation, Inc., Mississippi Feed and Grain Association, Mississippi Soybean Association and Delta Council shall submit the names of six (6) soybean producers to the Governor, and he shall appoint three (3) members from the nominees of each organization to serve on the board on rotating three-year terms. The original board shall be appointed with members of each of the aforenamed organizations appointed as follows: one (1) for one (1) year, one (1) for two (2) years, and one (1) for three (3) years. Each year thereafter, not less than thirty (30) days prior to the expiration of the terms of expiring board members, the aforenamed organizations shall submit the names of three (3) nominees to the Governor and succeeding boards shall be appointed by the Governor in the same manner, giving equal representation to each organization. Vacancies which occur shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments were made.

The members of the board shall meet and organize immediately after their appointment, and shall elect a chairman, vice chairman and secretary-treasurer from the membership of the board, whose duties shall be those customarily exercised by such officers or specifically designated by the board. The chairman, vice chairman and secretary-treasurer shall be bonded in an amount not less than Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00). The cost of said bonds shall be paid from the funds received under the provisions of this chapter. Such bond shall be a security for any illegal act of such member of the board and recovery thereon may be had by the state for any injury by such illegal act of such member. The board may establish rules and regulations for its own government and the administration of the affairs of the board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4575-232; Laws, 1970, ch. 265, § 2; brought forward without change, Laws, 2009, ch. 393, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 69-9-5.
Levy of assessment; collection; enforcement; refund.

There is imposed and levied an assessment at the rate of One Cent (1¢) per bushel on all soybeans grown within the State of Mississippi, and such assessment shall be deducted by the purchaser from the amount paid the producer at the first point of sale, whether within or without the state. Assessments on soybeans put under loan to the Commodity Credit Corporation or purchased by the Commodity Credit Corporation and delivered to it shall be payable when such soybeans are placed under loan or are purchased. The Commodity Credit Corporation may require deduction and payment of the assessment from the loan proceeds or from the purchase price on the behalf of the producer. Assessments on soybeans put under loan to the Commodity Credit Corporation and redeemed by the producer before the takeover date, if already paid by having been deducted from the loan proceeds, shall not be deducted by each handler from the amount paid the producer at the first point of sale as provided in this section; otherwise, the assessment shall be deducted. Any soybean producer may request and receive a refund of the amount of assessment deducted from the sale of his soybeans provided he makes a written application with the Department of Agriculture and Commerce within sixty (60) days from date of sale, supported by bona fide copies of sales slips signed by the purchaser. The application forms shall be prepared by the Department of Agriculture and Commerce and shall be available at the first point of sale. All such applications shall be processed and refunds paid by the Department of Agriculture and Commerce within sixty (60) days after the funds have been received by the department. Each marketing agency shall be furnished a poster to be displayed in a prominent place, stating that refunds are available and forms to be used, including self-addressed envelopes, are available at its office.

The assessment imposed and levied by this section shall be payable to and collected by the Department of Agriculture and Commerce, hereafter referred to as “the department,” from the purchaser of such soybeans at the first point of sale or from the Commodity Credit Corporation as provided in subsection (1) of this section. The proceeds of the assessment collected by the department shall be deposited with the State Treasurer in a special fund, known as the “Mississippi Soybean Promotion Fund,” and promptly remitted to the Mississippi State University Foundation under the terms and conditions as the Soybean Promotion Board deems necessary to ensure that the assessments are used properly in carrying out the purposes of this chapter. The State Fiscal Officer is authorized to issue warrants for the payment of monies from the Mississippi Soybean Promotion Fund upon requisition by the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, or his designee, for refunds to producers as provided under subsection (1) of this section.

The department shall pay over to the Mississippi Soybean Promotion Fund the funds collected, less three and one-half percent (3-1/2%) of the gross amount collected. The payments to the Mississippi Soybean Promotion Board shall be accompanied by a complete report of all funds collected and disbursed.

Each purchaser or the Commodity Credit Corporation shall keep a complete and accurate record of all soybeans handled by him and shall furnish each producer with a signed sales slip showing the number of bushels purchased from him and the amount deducted by him for the Mississippi Soybean Promotion Fund. Such records shall be in such form and contain such other information as the department shall by rule or regulation prescribe. The records shall be preserved by the purchaser for a period of two (2) years and shall be offered for inspection at any time upon oral or written demand by the department or any duly authorized agent or representative thereof. Every purchaser or the Commodity Credit Corporation, at such time or times as the department may require, shall submit reports or other documentary information deemed necessary for the efficient and equitable collection of the assessment imposed in this chapter. The department shall have the power to cause any duly authorized agent or representative to enter upon the premises of any purchaser of soybeans and examine or cause to be examined by such agent only books, papers and records which deal in any way with the payment of the assessment or enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4575-233; Laws, 1970, ch. 265, § 3; Laws, 1972, ch. 429, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 401; Laws, 1987, ch. 452, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 510, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 505, § 1; brought forward without change, Laws, 2009, ch. 393, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 69-9-6.
Collection of assessment under Soybean Promotion, Research and Consumer Information Act; disposition of funds collected.

The Department of Agriculture and Commerce is authorized to collect the assessment created by the Soybean Promotion, Research and Consumer Information Act administered by the United States Department of Agriculture on behalf of the Mississippi Soybean Promotion Board.

The department shall pay over to the Mississippi Soybean Promotion Fund, as established in Section 69-9-5, all funds collected under this section. The State Fiscal Officer is authorized to issue warrants for the payment of monies from the proceeds of this fund upon requisition by the Mississippi Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, or his designee, in accordance with federal statutes governing this section.

The Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce shall submit to the Soybean Promotion Board a budget detailing and justifying the administrative costs of the department in administering the provisions of this chapter, and such budget must be approved by the Soybean Promotion Board by April 1 of each year. The department is further authorized to retain an amount not to exceed three and one-half percent (3-1/2%) of the funds collected under the provisions of this section as administrative fees. The amount retained by the department must be approved by the Soybean Promotion Board by July 1 of each year. This amount may be retained from any funds collected on behalf of the Soybean Promotion Board, including those collected under the provisions of Section 69-9-5.

The board shall make a report of all income and expenditures made annually and provide copies of such report to the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 607 § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 510, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 505, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 29, 2006.).

§ 69-9-7.
Failure to file report or pay assessment; penalty.

Any purchaser who fails to file a report or to pay any assessment within the time required by the department shall forfeit to the department a penalty of five percent (5%) of the assessment determined to be due, plus one percent (1%) of such amount for each month of delay or fraction thereof after the first month after such report was required to be filed or such assessment became due. The penalty shall be paid to the department and shall be disposed of by it in the same manner as funds derived from the payment of the assessment imposed herein.

The department shall collect the penalties levied herein, together with the delinquent assessment, by any or all of the following methods:

By voluntary payment by the person liable.

By legal proceedings instituted in a court of competent jurisdiction.

Any person required to pay the assessment provided for in this chapter who fails to remit same or who refuses to allow full inspection of the premises, or such books, records or other documents relating to the liability of such person for the assessment herein imposed, or who shall hinder or in any way delay or prevent such inspection, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or by imprisonment not to exceed one (1) year, or both.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any person who purchases one thousand (1,000) or less bushels of soybeans in any calendar year, provided he is not regularly engaged in the purchase of soybeans.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4575-234; Laws, 1970, ch. 265, § 4; Laws, 1992, ch. 510, § 3; brought forward without change, Laws, 2009, ch. 393, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 69-9-9.
Use of funds; annual report; penalty for failure to report.

The Mississippi Soybean Promotion Board shall plan and conduct a program of research, education and advertising designed to promote the soybean industry in Mississippi and said board is authorized to use the funds derived from the assessment imposed herein for these purposes, including basic administration expenses of said plan. Use of these funds may be applied, as prescribed in this section, within or without the State of Mississippi, including regional, national and international research and promotional applications.

The funds may be expended only for the purposes set out in this chapter and shall be spent in no manner for political purposes. A report of all expenditures shall be made annually on December 31, with four (4) copies of the report to be filed and presented during regular sessions of the Mississippi Legislature with each of the following: the Chairman of the House of Representatives Agriculture Committee, the Chairman of the Senate Agriculture Committee, the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce and the State Auditor.

If the board fails to make an annual report in violation of the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, the board shall be subject to a fine of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4575-235; Laws, 1970, ch. 265, § 5; Laws, 2009, ch. 393, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 69-9-11.
Controlling effect of chapter.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any laws or parts of laws in conflict herewith, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling to the extent of the conflict.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4575-237; Laws, 1970, ch. 265, § 7; brought forward without change, Laws, 2009, ch. 393, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 69-9-13.
State Tax Commission to assist department in collecting assessments.

The State Tax Commission shall provide any information necessary to assist the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce in collecting the assessments provided for in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 510, § 4; brought forward without change, Laws, 2009, ch. 393, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 69-9-15.
Commissioner authorized to audit Soybean Promotion Board; information to be included in audit; injunction for violations of chapter.

The commissioner may conduct an audit of the board to verify compliance with any rules and regulations promulgated for the efficient enforcement of this chapter.

Under this section, the audited board shall provide information to the commissioner that verifies the amounts received and expended from the fees assessed and collected by the department and remitted to the board. Records maintained in the course of the normal conduct of business by the board may serve as verification.

The commissioner may apply for and the court may grant a temporary or permanent injunction on disbursements made to the board from violating or continuing to violate any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated under this chapter, notwithstanding the existence of other remedies at law. The injunction shall be issued without bond.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 393, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2009.